District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.34c

Creation of the Howard Theatre Redevelopment Project TIF Area.

There is hereby established the Howard Theatre Redevelopment Project TIF Area, which shall consist of the following real property:

(1)

Lot 90, Square 441 (with a street address of 620 T Street, N.W.);

(2)

Lot 807, Square 441 (with a street address of 1830 Wiltberger Street, N.W.); and

(3)

The Howard Theatre Parking Garage.

History

Dec. 7, 2010, D.C. Law 18-275, § 4, 57 DCR 9873

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-1217.34a.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of Howard Theatre Redevelopment project Great Streets Initiative Tax Increment Financing Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-516, August 3, 2010, 57 DCR 7971).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of Howard Theatre Redevelopment Project Great Streets Initiative Tax Increment Financing Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-573, October 19, 2010, 57 DCR 10090).